Arkansas, session 2025, SB388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-4-210(c), concerning the foreign
operations of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, is repealed.
(c) The commission shall report the progress of any foreign offices
annually to the Legislative Council, the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee, and the Governor.









*JLL260*
03/05/2025 9:59:34 AM JLL260